Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.005

Finding.

The certification of animal massage therapists is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare. While veterinarians and certain massage therapists may perform animal massage techniques, the legislature finds that meeting all of the requirements of those professions can be unnecessarily cumbersome for those individuals who would like to limit their practice only to animal massage.

[ 2016 c 41 s 19; 2007 c 70 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.